Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.625.150

Award program.

The board of directors of any school district may establish a commendable employee service and recognition award program for certificated and classified school employees. The program shall be designed to recognize exemplary service, special achievements, or outstanding contributions by an individual in the performance of his or her duties as an employee of the school district. The board of directors of the school district shall determine the extent and type of any nonmonetary award. The value of any nonmonetary award shall not be deemed salary or compensation for the purposes of RCW 28A.400.200 or chapter 41.32 RCW.

[ 1990 c 33 s 520; 1987 1st ex.s. c 2 s 210; 1985 c 399 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.58.842.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1987 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 84.52.0531.